Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6569SV (1) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2389 Section 1. Section 2.10, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. Every member of the general assembly except the presiding 3 officer of the senate, the speaker of the house, the majority 4 and minority floor leader of each house, and the president 5 pro tempore of the senate and speaker pro tempore of the 6 house shall receive an annual salary of twenty-five thousand 7 dollars for the year 2007 and subsequent years while serving 8 as a member of the general assembly. In addition, each such 9 member shall receive a per diem, as defined in subsection 10 5 , for expenses of office, except travel, for each day the 11 general assembly is in session commencing with the first day 12 of a legislative session and ending with the day of final 13 adjournment of each legislative session as indicated by the 14 journals of the house and senate, except that if the length of 15 the first regular session of the general assembly exceeds one 16 hundred ten fifty-five calendar days and the second regular 17 session exceeds one hundred fifty calendar days, the payments 18 shall be made only for one hundred ten fifty-five calendar 19 days for the first session and one hundred fifty calendar 20 days for the second session. Members from Polk county shall 21 receive an amount per day equal to three-fourths of the per 22 diem of the non-Polk county members. Each member shall receive 23 a three hundred dollar per month allowance for legislative 24 district constituency postage, travel, telephone costs, and 25 other expenses. Travel expenses shall be paid at the rate 26 established by section 8A.363 for actual travel in going to and 27 returning from the seat of government by the nearest traveled 28 route for not more than one time per week during a legislative 29 session unless the general assembly otherwise provides. 30